New Jersey, session 222, A3773.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     The Department of Human Services shall authorize a student of higher education who is the recipient of an award from the New Jersey Educational Opportunity Fund to obtain nutrition assistance benefits under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, regardless of whether the student satisfies the 20 hour weekly student work requirement established by federal law at 7 CFR 273.5(b)(5). b.    (1)     The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall remain inoperative until such time as the federal Food and Nutrition Service approves the change in, and authorizes a waiver of, existing federal student work requirements for the students identified in subsection a. of this section. (2)   Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, the commissioner shall:  (a) apply to the federal Food and Nutrition Service to secure any appropriate federal approvals or waivers that may be necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this section; and (b) take any additional actions as may be necessary to ensure that the States implementation of this section is done in compliance with all applicable provisions of federal and State law and regulation. c.     Following the receipt of necessary federal approvals and waivers, as provided by subsection b. of this section, the department shall implement and enforce the provisions of this section.  In so doing, the department shall institute a public awareness campaign that is designed to inform high school seniors and students of higher education about the new SNAP eligibility criteria applicable to Educational Opportunity Fund award recipients under this section. d.    As used in this section: Commissioner means the Commissioner of Human Services. Department means the Department of Human Services. Educational Opportunity Fund means the fund established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1968, c.142 (C.18A:71-31), which provides financial assistance to needy students to attend institutions of higher education. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or SNAP means the New Jersey Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, established pursuant to the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, Pub.L.110-246 (7 U.S.C. s.2011 et seq.). 2.    The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.